Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB680.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286 IS ESTABLISHED,
AND A NEW SECTION THEREOF IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in this subtitle:
(1) "Account" has the same meaning as in KRS 355.9-102;
(2) "Accounts receivable purchase transaction" means a transaction in which a
business sells all or a portion of any of the business's cash receipts, accounts, or
payment intangibles at a discount;
(3) "Business" means any individual, group of individuals, sole proprietorship,
corporation, limited liability company, trust, estate, cooperative, association,
limited partnership, or general partnership, which is engaged in a business
activity;
(4) "Business purpose":
(a) Means the proceeds of a loan, transaction, plan, or facility are:
1. Provided to a business; or
2. Intended to be used to carry on a business; and
(b) Does not include a loan, transaction, plan, or facility in which the proceeds
are intended to be used for personal, family, or household purposes;
(5) "Commercial financing facility" means an agreement to engage in multiple
accounts receivable purchase transactions with a business over a period of time;
(6) "Commercial financing provider" means a person that enters into either of the
following:
(a) More than five (5) commercial financing transactions with businesses
located in Kentucky in any calendar year; or
(b) A written agreement with a depository institution to arrange a commercial
financing transaction between the depository institution and a business via
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 942
an online lending platform administered by the person;
(7) (a) "Commercial financing transaction":
1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, means a
commercial loan, an accounts receivable purchase transaction, a
commercial open-end financing plan, or commercial financing facility
that is:
a. For a business purpose;
b. Equal to or less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000);
and
c. Not:
i. Secured by real property;
ii. A lease; or
iii. A purchase money obligation that is incurred as all or part
of the price of the collateral or for value given to enable the
business to acquire rights in or use of the collateral if the
value is in fact so used; and
2. Does not include a commercial loan or a commercial open-end
financing plan of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) made to:
a. A motor vehicle dealer, as defined in KRS 190.010, or an
affiliate of the dealer; or
b. A vehicle rental company or an affiliate of the company.
(b) As used in this subsection:
1. "Commercial loan" means a loan to a business, whether secured or
unsecured; and
2. "Commercial open-end financing plan" means financing extended to
a business under a plan in which:
a. Repeat transactions are reasonably contemplated; and
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 942
b. The amount of financing that may be extended to the business
during the term of the plan, up to any limit set by the plan, is
made available to the extent that any outstanding balance is
repaid;
(8) "Depository institution" means any bank, bank holding company, trust company,
savings and loan association, savings and loan association holding company,
credit union, or wholly owned subsidiary of any of the foregoing, which is
organized under the laws of Kentucky, any other state, or the United States; and
(9) "Payment intangible" has the same meaning as in KRS 355.9-102.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
This subtitle shall not apply to any commercial financing provider that is:
(1) A federally insured depository institution;
(2) An affiliate or holding company of a federally insured depository institution;
(3) A subsidiary or service corporation that is owned and controlled by, or under
common ownership with, a federally insured depository institution;
(4) A lender regulated under the Farm Credit Act of 1971, 12 U.S.C. sec. 2001 et
seq.;
(5) A person offering a commercial financing transaction in connection with the sale
or lease of products or services that the person, the person's parent company, or
any of the person's directly or indirectly owned and controlled subsidiaries
manufactures, licenses, or distributes;
(6) A person licensed as a money transmitter in Kentucky or any other state, district,
or territory of the United States; or
(7) The Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 942
(1) A person shall not engage in a commercial financing transaction as a
commercial financing provider with a business located in Kentucky unless the
person:
(a) Has filed a registration in accordance with this section; and
(b) The registration is effective under this section.
(2) Each initial and renewal registration filed under this section shall expire on
February 1 of the following calendar year, unless the registration is renewed in
accordance with this section prior to the expiration date.
(3) (a) Each person seeking to file an initial or renewal registration under this
section shall make the filing on a registration form prescribed by the
commissioner by an administrative regulation promulgated in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A.
(b) The form prescribed by the commissioner under paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall, for each person seeking to register as a commercial
financing provider, include the following:
1. The name of the person;
2. The name in which the person transacts business, if different from the
name provided under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph;
3. The address of the person's principal office, which may be outside of
Kentucky;
4. Whether any officer, director, manager, operator, or principal of the
person has been convicted of a felony involving an act of fraud,
dishonesty, breach of trust, or money laundering; and
5. The name and address in Kentucky of a designated agent upon whom
service of process against the person may be made.
(4) An initial or renewal registration filed in accordance with subsection (3)(a) of
this section shall become effective upon receipt by the department of:
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 942
(a) The completed registration form; and
(b) A registration fee of two hundred dollars ($200).
(5) If information in a registration form changes or otherwise becomes inaccurate
after filing, the commercial financing provider shall not be required to notify the
commissioner or correct the information prior to the time of renewal.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An accounts receivable purchase transaction that is identified in the transaction's
governing documents as a purchase shall be conclusive proof that the transaction
is not a loan or credit.
(2) (a) When determining whether any loan, transaction, plan, or facility is for a
business purpose, a commercial financing provider may rely on any written
statement of intended purpose signed by the business.
(b) The written statement referenced in paragraph (a) of this subsection may be
a separate statement or contained in an application, agreement, or other
document signed by an authorized representative of the business.
(3) The extension of a specific offer for a commercial financing transaction by a
commercial financing provider on behalf of a depository institution shall not be
construed to mean that the provider engaged in lending, financing, or loan
origination.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a commercial financing
provider that enters into a commercial financing transaction shall provide the
following written disclosures of the terms of the transaction to the business:
(a) The total amount provided to the business;
(b) If applicable, the total amount disbursed to the business after the deduction
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 942
of:
1. Fees; and
2. Amounts paid to:
a. The provider to satisfy a prior balance; and
b. A third party on behalf of the business;
(c) The total amount to be paid to the provider;
(d) The total dollar cost, which shall be the difference between the amount
disclosed under paragraph (a) of this subsection and the amount disclosed
under paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(e) If the amount of each payment does not vary, the manner, frequency, and
amount of each payment;
(f) If the amount of each payment may vary:
1. The manner and frequency of each payment;
2. The estimated amount of the initial payment;
3. A description of the methodology for calculating any variable
payment; and
4. The circumstances under which payments may vary; and
(g) Whether there are any costs or discounts associated with prepayment,
including a reference to the prepayment provision or provisions in the
transaction agreement.
(2) A commercial financing provider that enters into a commercial financing facility
may provide the disclosures required under subsection (1) of this section based on
an example transaction for an account with a total face amount owed of ten
thousand dollars ($10,000).
(3) (a) Only one (1) written disclosure of the terms of a commercial financing
transaction under this section is required for each transaction.
(b) A disclosure of the terms of a commercial financing transaction under this
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 942
section:
1. Shall be provided at or before the time the business enters the
commercial financing transaction; and
2. Is not required:
a. As a result of a modification, forbearance, or change to a
commercial financing transaction; or
b. For a commercial financing facility, each time cash receipts,
accounts, or payment intangibles are purchased under the
facility.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 13 OF KRS CHAPTER 286
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The commissioner shall have exclusive authority to enforce this subtitle.
(2) The commissioner may:
(a) Receive and act on complaints relating to alleged violations of this subtitle;
(b) Take action designed to obtain voluntary compliance with this subtitle;
(c) Commence administrative or judicial proceedings to enforce compliance
with this subtitle; and
(d) Seek civil penalties against any person arising from the use of
documentation or materials found to be in violation of any provision of this
subtitle of:
1. Five hundred dollars ($500) per violation, not to exceed twenty
thousand dollars ($20,000) for all aggregated violations; or
2. One thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation, not to exceed fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000) for all aggregated violations, if the person
has previously received notice from the commissioner of a prior
violation under this paragraph.
(3) The remedies set forth in this section shall be the exclusive remedies for any
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 942
violation of this subtitle.
(4) A violation of any provision of this subtitle shall not affect the enforceability or
validity of any commercial financing transaction.
Section 7. Subtitle 13 of KRS Chapter 286 may be cited as the Kentucky
Commercial Financing Disclosure Law.
Section 8. This Act applies to contracts entered on or after January 1, 2026.
Section 9. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:29 PM Jacketed